Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-407.12
Deferred annuity contract; company; terminate; cash payment.

Notwithstanding the requirements of section 44-407.11, any deferred annuity contract may provide that if no considerations have been received under a contract for a period of two full years and the portion of the paid-up annuity benefit at maturity on the plan stipulated in the contract arising from considerations paid prior to such period would be less than twenty dollars monthly, the company may at its option terminate such contract by payment in cash of the then present value of such portion of the paid-up annuity benefit, calculated on the basis of the mortality table, if any, and interest rate specified in the contract for determining the paid-up annuity benefit, and by such payment shall be relieved of any further obligation under such contract.

Laws 1979, LB 354, § 8.